Tennessee, session 114, SB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 8, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following new section:
A state or local law enforcement officer must be given written notice by a state or
local governmental entity or official prior to being placed on a Brady list setting forth the
allegations for placement on the list, and must be given at least ten (10) business days
to respond to such allegations before placement on the list is finalized.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1210
003300
- 1 -